it: Design della punta dello stivaletto: Separazione interna; Rotonda; Separata; A tre dita; Altro
hr-HR: Dizajn šiljastih čizmica: Unutarnji rascjep; Okrugli; Rascjep; Tri prsta; Ostalo
hu: Szörfcsizma orrészének kialakítása: Belső elválasztásos; Kerek; Osztott ujjú; Háromujjas; Egyéb
pt-BR: Design do bico de botinha: Fenda interna; Redondo; Com fenda; Três dedos; Outros
es: Diseño de la puntera del botín: División interna; Redondo; Dividido; De tres dedos; Otro
fi: Tossun kärjen muotoilu: Sisäinen halkio; Pyöreä; Halkio; Kolmisorminen; Muu
sl-SI: Oblika za prste čevljev za surfanje: Notranje deljeni prsti; Okrogla; Deljena; Triprstna; Drugo
cs: Design špičky botičky: Skrytá oddělená špička; Kulatá špička; Oddělená špička; Tříprsté; Jiné
de: Zehenkappendesign des Booties: Interner Split-Toe; Round-Toe; Split-Toe; Drei-Finger; Sonstige
fr: Conception de l’avant-pied des chaussons: Séparation interne; Rond; Bout fendu; Trois doigts; Autre
vi: Thiết kế mũi giày: Tách ngón bên trong; Tròn; Tách ngón; Ba ngón; Khác
nb: Tådesign med støvletter: Innvendig splitt; Rund; Splitt; Trefinger; Annet
pl: Konstrukcja noska butów neoprenowych: Ukryty podział palca; Okrągłe; Split toe; Trójpalczaste; Inne
en: Bootie toe design: Internal split; Round; Split; Three-finger; Other
ja: ブーティートゥデザイン: 内部スプリット; ラウンド; スプリット; 3本指; その他
sk-SK: Dizajn špičky topánok: Vnútorné delenie prstov; Okrúhly; Oddelené prsty; Trojprstový; Iný
zh-TW: 短靴式鞋頭設計: 內部腳趾分隔; 圓頭; 腳趾分隔; 三指; 其他
ko: 부티 토 디자인: 내부 스플릿; 라운드; 스플릿; 쓰리 핑거; 기타
nl: Bootie neus ontwerp: Intern gesplitst; Rond; Gesplitst; Drie vingers; Overige
el: Σχεδιασμός δακτύλων για μποτάκια: Εσωτερικός διαχωρισμός; Στρογγυλό; Με διαχωρισμό; Με τρία δάχτυλα; Άλλο
sv: Tådesign för kort stövel: Intern split-toe; Rund; Delad tå; Trefinger; Annan
bg-BG: Дизайн на предната част за пръстите: Вътрешно разделен; Заоблен; Разделен; С три пръста; Друго
ro-RO: Design pentru vârful botinei: Deget separat intern; Rotund; Deget separat; Trei degete; Altele
ru: Конструкция носка ботинка: Скрытый раздельный палец; Круглый мысок; Раздельный палец; Трёхпалый; Другое
zh-CN: 潜水靴鞋头设计: 内部双趾; 圆头; 分趾; 三趾; 其他
lt-LT: Minkštų batelių pirštų dalies dizainas: Vidinis atskyrimas; Apvalus; Atskirtas; Trijų pirštų; Kitas
tr: Patik burun tasarımı: İçten ayrık; Yuvarlak; Ayrık; Üç parmaklı; Diğer
pt-PT: Design da biqueira da bota: Separador interno; Redondo; Separado; Três dedos; Outro
da: Støvletå-design: Indvendig split; Rund; Split; Trefingret; Andet
th: ดีไซน์ส่วนปลายรองเท้าหุ้มข้อ: แยกนิ้วซ่อนด้านใน; หัวมน; หัวแยก; สามนิ้ว; อื่นๆ